Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1134
Department; powers and duties.

The department shall have the power and duty:

(1) To advise, consult, cooperate, and contract with other agencies of the state, the federal government, other states and interstate agencies, political subdivisions, industries, and groups in furtherance of the purposes of the Nebraska Chemigation Act; and

(2) To receive or initiate complaints of water contamination, hold hearings in connection with water contamination, and institute legal proceedings in the name of the state for the control or prevention of water contamination.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 34.